Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0216.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 Sec. 79g. (1) "Vulnerable roadway user" means any of the following: (a) A pedestrian. (b) An individual using any of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Roller skates. (ii) Inline skates. (iii) A nonmotorized scooter. (iv) A nonmotorized skateboard. (v) A wheelchair. (c) An individual riding an equine or driving or riding an equine-drawn carriage. (d) An individual operating or riding a vulnerable transportation device in compliance with this act. (e) A United States Postal Service employee or contractor operating a vehicle on that individual's rural postal route in the course of delivering mail or parcels. (2) As used in this section, "equine" means a horse, pony, donkey, mule, or hinny. Sec. 79h. "Vulnerable transportation device" means a device in, on, or by which an individual is or may be transported or drawn on a highway or street by human power, or by an electrical propulsion system with a power of not greater than 750 watts or 1 horsepower and a maximum speed on a paved level surface of not more than 30 miles per hour. Vulnerable transportation device includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) An electric personal assistive mobility device as that term is defined in section 13c. (b) An electric bicycle as that term is defined in section 13e. (c) An electric skateboard as that term is defined in section 13f. (d) A bicycle as that term is defined in section 4. Sec. 303. (1) The secretary of state shall not issue a license 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under this act to any of the following individuals: (a) An individual, as an operator, who is less than 18 years of age, except as otherwise provided in this act. (b) An individual, as a chauffeur, who is less than 18 years of age, except as otherwise provided in this act. (c) An individual whose license is suspended, revoked, denied, or canceled in any state. If the suspension, revocation, denial, or cancellation is not from the jurisdiction that issued the last license to the individual, the secretary of state may issue a license after the expiration of 5 years from the effective date of the most recent suspension, revocation, denial, or cancellation. (d) An individual who in the opinion of the secretary of state is afflicted with or suffering from a physical or mental disability or disease that prevents the individual from exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle while operating the motor vehicle on the highways. (e) An individual who is unable to understand highway warning or direction signs in the English language. (f) An individual who is unable to pass a knowledge, skill, or ability test administered by the secretary of state in connection with issuing an original operator's or chauffeur's license, original motorcycle indorsement, endorsement, or an original or renewal of a vehicle group designation or vehicle indorsement.endorsement. (g) A nonresident, including, but not limited to, a foreign exchange student. (h) An individual who has failed to answer a citation or notice to appear in court or for any matter pending or fails to comply with an order or judgment of the court, including, but not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 limited to, paying all fines, costs, fees, and assessments, in violation of section 321a, until that individual answers the citation or notice to appear in court or for any matter pending or complies with an order or judgment of the court, including, but not limited to, paying all fines, costs, fees, and assessments, as provided under section 321a. (i) An individual not licensed under this act who has been convicted of, has received a juvenile disposition for, or has been determined responsible for a crime or civil infraction described in section 319, 324, or 904. An individual shall must be denied a license under this subdivision for the length of time corresponding to the period of the licensing sanction that would have been imposed under section 319, 324, or 904 if the individual had been licensed at the time of the violation. (j) An individual not licensed under this act who is determined to have violated section 624a or 624b. The individual shall must be denied a license under this subdivision for a period of time that corresponds to the period of the licensing sanction that would have been imposed under those sections had the individual been licensed at the time of the violation. (k) An individual whose commercial driver license application is canceled under section 324(2). (l) Unless otherwise eligible under section 307(1), an individual who is not a citizen of the United States. (2) On receiving the appropriate records of conviction, the secretary of state shall revoke the operator's or chauffeur's license of an individual and deny issuance of an operator's or chauffeur's license to an individual who has any of the following, whether under a law of this state, a local ordinance that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 substantially corresponds to a law of this state, a law of another state that substantially corresponds to a law of this state, or, beginning October 31, 2010, a law of the United States that substantially corresponds to a law of this state: (a) Any combination of 2 convictions within 7 years for reckless driving in violation of section 626 before October 31, 2010 or, beginning October 31, 2010, 626(2). (b) Any combination of 2 or more convictions within 7 years for any of the following: (i) A felony in which a motor vehicle was used. (ii) A violation or attempted violation of section 601b(2) or (3), section 601c(1), or (2), (3), or (4), section 602a(4) or (5), section 617, section 653a(3) or (4), or section 904(4) or (5). (iii) Negligent homicide, manslaughter, or murder that results from the operation of a vehicle or an attempt to commit any of those crimes. (iv) A violation or attempted violation of section 479a(4) or (5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.479a. (c) Any combination of 2 convictions within 7 years for any of the following or a combination of 1 conviction for a violation or attempted violation of section 625(6) and 1 conviction for any of the following within 7 years: (i) A violation or attempted violation of section 625, except a violation of section 625(2), or a violation of any prior enactment of section 625 in which the defendant operated a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating or alcoholic liquor or a controlled substance, or a combination of intoxicating or alcoholic liquor and a controlled substance, or while visibly impaired, or with an unlawful bodily alcohol content. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (ii) A violation or attempted violation of section 625m. (iii) A violation or attempted violation of former section 625b. (d) One conviction for a violation or attempted violation of section 315(5), section 601b(3), section 601c(2), 601c(3) or (4), section 602a(4) or (5), section 617, section 625(4) or (5), section 653a(4), section 904(4) or (5), or, beginning October 31, 2010, section 626(3) or (4). (e) One conviction of negligent homicide, manslaughter, or murder that results from the operation of a vehicle or an attempt to commit any of those crimes. (f) One conviction for a violation or attempted violation of section 479a(4) or (5) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.479a. (g) Any combination of 3 convictions within 10 years for any of the following or 1 conviction for a violation or attempted violation of section 625(6) and any combination of 2 convictions for any of the following within 10 years, if any of the convictions resulted from an arrest on or after January 1, 1992: (i) A violation or attempted violation of section 625, except a violation of section 625(2), or a violation of any prior enactment of section 625 in which the defendant operated a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating or alcoholic liquor or a controlled substance, or a combination of intoxicating or alcoholic liquor and a controlled substance, or while visibly impaired, or with an unlawful bodily alcohol content. (ii) A violation or attempted violation of section 625m. (iii) A violation or attempted violation of former section 625b. (3) The secretary of state shall revoke a license under subsection (2) notwithstanding a court order unless the court order 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 complies with section 323. (4) Except as otherwise provided under section 304, the secretary of state shall not issue a license under this act to an individual whose license has been revoked under this act or revoked and denied under subsection (2) until all of the following occur, as applicable: (a) The later of the following: (i) The expiration of not less than 1 year after the license was revoked or denied. (ii) The expiration of not less than 5 years after the date of a subsequent revocation or denial occurring within 7 years after the date of any prior revocation or denial. (b) For a denial under subsection (2)(a), (b), (c), and (g), the individual rebuts by clear and convincing evidence the presumption that results from the prima facie evidence that the individual is a habitual offender. The convictions that resulted in the revocation and denial constitute prima facie evidence that the individual is a habitual offender. (c) The individual meets the requirements of the department. (5) The secretary of state shall deny issuing a vehicle group designation to an individual under either of the following circumstances: (a) The individual has been disqualified by the United States Secretary of Transportation from operating a commercial motor vehicle. (b) Beginning on and after January 30, 2012, the individual does not meet the requirements of the federal regulations under 49 CFR parts 383 and 391 by refusing to certify the type of commercial motor vehicle operation the individual intends to perform and, if 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 required, fails to present to the secretary of state a valid medical certification. (6) Multiple convictions or civil infraction determinations that result from the same incident must be treated as a single violation for purposes of denial or revocation of a license under this section. (7) As used in this section, "felony in which a motor vehicle was used" means a felony during the commission of which the individual operated a motor vehicle and while operating the vehicle presented real or potential harm to individuals or property and 1 or more of the following circumstances existed: (a) The vehicle was used as an instrument of the felony. (b) The vehicle was used to transport a victim of the felony. (c) The vehicle was used to flee the scene of the felony. (d) The vehicle was necessary for the commission of the felony. Sec. 320a. (1) Within Not later than 5 days after receipt of a properly prepared abstract from a court of this state or another state, the secretary of state shall record the date of conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition, and the number of points for each, based on the following formula, except as otherwise provided in this section and section 629c: (a) Manslaughter, negligent homicide, or a felony resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, ORV, or snowmobile 6 points (b) A violation of section 601b(2) or (3), 601c(1), or (2), (3), or (4), or 653a(3) or (4) or, beginning October 31, 2010, a violation of section 601d 6 points 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 (c) A violation of section 625(1), (4), (5), (7), or (8), section 81134 or 82127(1) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81134 and 324.82127, or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625(1), (4), (5), (7), or (8), or section 81134 or 82127(1) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81134 and 324.82127 6 points (d) Failing to stop and disclose identity at the scene of an accident when required by law 6 points (e) Operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 626 6 points (f) Fleeing or eluding an officer 6 points (g) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to speed in a work zone described in that section by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 15 miles per hour 5 points (h) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 15 miles per hour 4 points (i) A violation of section 625(3) or (6), section 82127(3) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82127, or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625(3) or (6) or section 82127(3) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82127 4 points (j) A violation of section 626a or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 626a 4 points 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (k) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to speed in a work zone described in that section by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 10 but not more than 15 miles per hour 4 points (l) Beginning October 31, 2010, a moving violation resulting in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an individual, or any other object 4 points (m) Careless driving in violation of section 626b or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 626b 3 points (n) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 10 miles per hour but not more than 15 miles per hour 3 points (o) A violation of section 653a(2) 2 points (p) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 5 miles per hour but not more than 10 miles per hour 2 points (q) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 1 mile per hour but not more than 5 miles per hour 1 point (r) Disobeying a traffic signal or stop sign, or improper passing 3 points (s) A violation of section 624a, 624b, or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 624a or 624b 2 points (t) A violation of section 310e(4) or (6) or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 310e(4) or (6) 2 points 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (u) All other moving violations pertaining to the operation of motor vehicles reported under this section 2 points (v) A refusal by an individual less than 21 years of age to submit to a preliminary breath test required by a peace officer under section 625a 2 points (w) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to speed in a work zone described in that section by exceeding the lawful maximum by 10 miles per hour or less 3 points (x) A third or subsequent violation of section 602b 2 points (y) A second violation of section 602b 1 point (2) Points must not be entered for a violation of section 310e(14), 311, 602c, 625m, 658, 710d, 717, 719, 719a, or 723. (3) Points must not be entered for bond forfeitures. (4) Points must not be entered for overweight loads or for defective equipment. (5) If more than 1 conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition results from the same incident, points must be entered only for the violation that receives the highest number of points under this section. (6) If an individual has accumulated 9 points as provided in this section, the secretary of state may call the individual in for an interview as to the individual's driving ability and record after due notice as to time and place of the interview. If the individual fails to appear as provided in this subsection, the secretary of state shall add 3 points to the individual's record. (7) If an individual violates a speed restriction established by an executive order issued during a state of energy emergency as provided by 1982 PA 191, MCL 10.81 to 10.89, the secretary of state shall enter points for the violation under subsection (1). 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (8) The secretary of state shall enter 6 points upon the record of an individual whose license is suspended or denied under section 625f. However, if a conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition results from the same incident, additional points for that offense must not be entered. (9) If a Michigan driver commits a violation in another state that would be a civil infraction if committed in this state, and a conviction results solely because of the failure of the Michigan driver to appear in that state to contest the violation, upon receipt of the abstract of conviction by the secretary of state, the violation must be noted on the Michigan driver's record, but points must not be assessed against the Michigan driver license. Sec. 601c. (1) A person An individual who commits a moving violation that has criminal penalties and as a result causes injury to a person vulnerable roadway user who is in compliance with this act or an individual operating an implement of husbandry on a highway in compliance with this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who commits a moving violation and as a result causes a serious injury requiring inpatient treatment at a hospital or post-acute rehabilitation facility to a vulnerable roadway user who is in compliance with this act or an individual operating an implement of husbandry on a highway in compliance with this act is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who commits a moving violation and as a result causes death to a vulnerable roadway user who is in compliance with this act is guilty of a felony punishable by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both. (4) (2) A person An individual who commits a moving violation that has criminal penalties and as a result causes death to a person an individual operating an implement of husbandry on a highway in compliance with this act is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both. (5) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for a violation of any other law committed by the individual while violating this section, except for a violation of section 626(4). (6) (3) As used in this section: , "moving (a) "Hospital" means that term as defined in section 20106 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20106. (b) "Moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this act that occurs while a person an individual is operating a motor vehicle, and for which the person individual is subject to a fine. (c) "Serious injury" means that term as defined in section 602a. Sec. 653a. (1) Upon approaching and passing a stationary authorized emergency vehicle that is giving a visual signal by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating red, blue, white, or amber, or green lights as permitted by section 698, or by means of front and rear warning lamps as permitted by section 698a, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall exhibit due care and caution, as required under the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) On any public roadway with at least 2 adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction of the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed with caution, reduce his or her the vehicle's speed by at least 10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit, and yield the right-of-way by moving into a lane at least 1 moving lane or 2 vehicle widths apart from the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, unless directed otherwise by a police officer. If movement to an adjacent lane or 2 vehicle widths apart is not possible due to weather, road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular or pedestrian traffic in parallel moving lanes, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed as required in subdivision (b). (b) On any public roadway that does not have at least 2 adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction as the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, or if the movement by the driver of the vehicle into an adjacent lane or 2 vehicle widths apart is not possible as described in subdivision (a), the approaching vehicle driver shall proceed with due care and caution and reduce his or her the vehicle's speed by at least 10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit, or as directed by a police officer. (2) Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (3) and (4), a person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. Beginning 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that amended this subsection, except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), a person an individual who violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction and shall must be ordered to pay a civil fine of $400.00.as follows: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) For an individual who violates this section except as described in subdivision (b), $400.00. (b) For an individual who violates this section and the stationary vehicle is an authorized emergency vehicle with a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel present, $750.00. (3) A person An individual who violates this section and causes injury to a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel in the immediate area of the a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 2 years, or both. (4) A person An individual who violates this section and causes death to a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel in the immediate area of the a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $7,500.00 or by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, or both. (5) The operator driver of a vehicle upon on a highway that has been divided into 2 roadways by leaving an intervening space, or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing sections so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, is not required to proceed with caution, reduce his or her the vehicle's speed, or yield the right-of-way for an authorized emergency a stationary vehicle that is stopped across the dividing space, barrier, or section. (6) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 907. (1) A violation of this act, or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, that is designated a civil infraction must not be considered a lesser included offense of a criminal offense. (2) Permission may be granted for payment of a civil fine and costs to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments but, unless permission is included in the order or judgment, the civil fine and costs must be payable immediately. Except as otherwise provided, a person found responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction must pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and 1 or more of the following civil fines, as applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided, for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, the person must be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. (b) If the civil infraction was a moving violation that resulted in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an individual, or any other object, the civil fine ordered under this section is increased by $25.00 but the total civil fine must not be more than $100.00. (c) For a violation of section 240, the civil fine ordered under this section is $15.00. (d) For a violation of section 312a(4)(a), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $250.00. (e) For a first violation of section 319f(1), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $2,500.00 or more than $2,750.00; for a second or subsequent violation, the civil fine must not be less than $5,000.00 or more than $5,500.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) For a violation of section 319g(1)(a), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10,000.00. (g) For a violation of section 319g(1)(g), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $2,750.00 or more than $25,000.00. (h) For a violation of section 602b, the civil fine ordered under this section must be as follows: (i) For a violation of section 602b(1), either of the following: (A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $100.00 for a first offense and $250.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (B) If the violation involves an accident, $200.00 for a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (ii) For a violation of section 602b(2), either of the following: (A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $200.00 for a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (B) If the violation involves an accident, $400.00 for a first offense and $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (i) For a violation of section 627c, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $150.00 for a second violation as described in section 627c(2)(b) and $300.00 for a third or subsequent violation described in section 627c(2)(c). (j) For a violation of section 653a(2), the civil fine ordered under this section must be either of the following: (i) For a violation described in section 653a(2)(a), $400.00. (ii) For a violation described in section 653a(2)(b), $750.00. (k) (j) For a violation of section 674(1)(s) or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 674(1)(s), the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more than $250.00. (l) (k) For a violation of section 676a(3), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00. (m) (l) For a violation of section 676c, the civil fine ordered under this section is $1,000.00. (n) (m) For a violation of section 682 or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 682, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more than $500.00. (o) (n) For a violation of section 710d, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00, subject to subsection (11). (p) (o) For a violation of section 710e, the civil fine and court costs ordered under this subsection must be $25.00. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an individual is determined to be responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act while driving a commercial motor vehicle, the individual must be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine of not more than $250.00. (4) If a civil fine is ordered under subsection (2) or (3), the judge or district court magistrate shall summarily tax and determine the costs of the action, which are not limited to the costs taxable in ordinary civil actions, and may include all expenses, direct and indirect, to which the plaintiff has been put in connection with the civil infraction, up to the entry of judgment. Costs must not be ordered in excess of $100.00. A civil 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 fine ordered under subsection (2) or (3) must not be waived unless costs ordered under this subsection are waived. Except as otherwise provided by law, costs are payable to the general fund of the plaintiff. (5) In addition to a civil fine and costs ordered under subsection (2) or (3) and subsection (4) and the justice system assessment ordered under subsection (12), the judge or district court magistrate may order the individual to attend and complete a program of treatment, education, or rehabilitation. (6) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions permitted under subsections (2), (3), and (5) only to the extent expressly authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the district court district. (7) Each district of the district court and each municipal court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and assessments to be imposed for civil infractions that occur within the respective district or city. If a schedule is established, it must be prominently posted and readily available for public inspection. A schedule need not include all violations that are designated by law or ordinance as civil infractions. A schedule may exclude cases on the basis of a defendant's prior record of civil infractions or traffic offenses, or a combination of civil infractions and traffic offenses. (8) The state court administrator shall annually publish and distribute to each district and court a recommended range of civil fines and costs for first-time civil infractions. This recommendation is not binding on the courts that have jurisdiction over civil infractions but is intended to act as a normative guide for judges and district court magistrates and a basis for public 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 evaluation of disparities in the imposition of civil fines and costs throughout this state. (9) If a person has received a civil infraction citation for defective safety equipment on a vehicle under section 683, the court shall waive a civil fine, costs, and assessments on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that repair of the defective equipment was made before the appearance date on the citation. (10) A default in the payment of a civil fine or costs ordered under subsection (2), (3), or (4) or a justice system assessment ordered under subsection (12), or an installment of the fine, costs, or assessment, may be collected by a means authorized for the enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4001 to 600.4065, or under chapter 60 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.6001 to 600.6098. (11) Before the effective date of 2024 PA 22, April 2, 2025, the court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition, purchase, or rental of a child seating system meeting the requirements of section 710d. Beginning on the effective date of 2024 PA 22, April 2, 2025, the court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition of a child seating system that meets the requirements of section 710d and evidence that the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individual has received education from a certified child passenger safety technician. (12) In addition to any civil fines or costs ordered to be paid under this section, the judge or district court magistrate shall order the defendant to pay a justice system assessment of $40.00 for each civil infraction determination, except for a parking violation or a violation for which the total fine and costs imposed are $10.00 or less. On payment of the assessment, the clerk of the court shall transmit the assessment collected to the state treasury to be deposited into the justice system fund created in section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.181. An assessment levied under this subsection is not a civil fine for purposes of section 909. (13) If a person has received a citation for a violation of section 223, the court shall waive any civil fine, costs, and assessment on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that the person, before the appearance date on the citation, produced a valid registration certificate that was valid on the date the violation of section 223 occurred. (14) If a person has received a citation for a violation of section 328(1) for failing to produce a certificate of insurance under section 328(2), the court may waive the fee described in section 328(3)(c) and shall waive any fine, costs, and any other fee or assessment otherwise authorized under this act on receipt of verification by the court that the person, before the appearance date on the citation, produced valid proof of insurance that was in effect when the violation of section 328(1) occurred. Insurance obtained after the violation occurred does not make the person eligible for a waiver under this subsection. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 (15) If a person is determined to be responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act and the civil infraction arises out of the ownership or operation of a commercial quadricycle, the person must be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine of not more than $500.00. (16) As used in this section, "moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to this act that involves the operation of a motor vehicle and for which a fine may be assessed. Enacting section 1. Section 653b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.653b, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 3. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 217 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.